Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2111
Political subdivision; remove, reduce, or simplify certain resolutions, regulations, or ordinances; when.

In order to accomplish the purposes of the Enterprise Zone Act, any political subdivision may remove, reduce, or simplify, in whole or in part, the provisions of any resolution, regulation, or ordinance relating to fees or administrative or procedural requirements as they relate to enterprise zones or entities or persons within the boundaries of an enterprise zone, except that such removal, reduction, or simplification shall not occur unless there is a finding by the political subdivision that the proposed action would not endanger the health or safety of the public.

Laws 1992, LB 1240, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 725, § 12.